src/fst/stems/pronouns.lexc
!! # Buryaad pronouns

!! This file contains pronouns.

!! So far, the following pronouns are covered:

LEXICON Pronoun !!= * **@CODE***

Personal ;         !!=     - **@CODE***
Demonstrative ;
!Reflexive ;        
Unclassified ;

LEXICON Personal
би+Pron+Pers+Sg1: BI_LEX ;
ши+Pron+Pers+Sg2: SHI_LEX ;
тэрэ+Pron+Pers+Sg3: TERE_LEX ;

бидэ+Pron+Pers+Pl1: BIDE_LEX ;
бидэнэр+Pron+Pers+Pl1: BIDENER_LEX ;
маанар+Pron+Pers+Pl1: MAANAR_LEX ;
маанад+Pron+Pers+Pl1: MAANAD_LEX ;
маанадууд+Pron+Pers+Pl1: MAANADUUD_LEX ;

та+Pron+Pers+Pl2: TA_LEX ;
таанар+Pron+Pers+Pl2: TAANAR_LEX ;
таанад+Pron+Pers+Pl2: TAANAD_LEX ;
таанадууд+Pron+Pers+Pl2: TAANADUUD_LEX ;

тэдэ+Pron+Pers+Pl3: TEDE_LEX ;
тэдэнэр+Pron+Pers+Pl3: TEDENER_LEX ;
тэдээнүүд+Pron+Pers+Pl3: TEDEENUUD_LEX ;

LEXICON BI_LEX
+Nom:би PD ;
+Acc:намайе PD ;
+Acc+Use/NG:намай PD ;
+Gen:минии PD ;
+Dat:намда PD ;
+Abl:намһаа PD ;
+Com:намтай PD ;
+Ins:намаар PD ;

LEXICON BIDE_LEX
+Nom:бидэ PD ;
+Acc:бидэниие PD ;
+Acc+Use/NG:бидэнии PD ;
+Gen:бидэнэй PD ;
+Dat:бидэндэ PD ;
+Abl:бидэнһээ PD ;
+Com:бидэнтэй PD ;
+Ins:бидэнээр PD ;

LEXICON BIDENER_LEX
+Nom:бидэнэр PD ;
+Acc:бидэнэрые PD ;
+Acc+Use/NG:бидэнэры PD ;
+Gen:бидэнэрэй PD ;
+Dat:бидэнэртэ PD ;
+Abl:бидэнэрһээ PD ;
+Com:бидэнэртэй PD ;
+Ins:бидэнэрээр PD ;

LEXICON MAANAR_LEX
+Nom:маанар PD ;
+Acc:маниие PD ;
+Acc+Use/NG:мании PD ;
+Acc+Use/NG:маанарые PD ;
+Acc+Use/NG:маанары PD ;
+Gen:манай PD ;
+Gen+Use/NG:маанарые PD ;
+Dat:манда PD ;
+Dat+Use/NG:маанарта PD ;
+Abl:манһаа PD ;
+Abl+Use/NG:маанарһаа PD ;
+Com:мантай PD ;
+Com+Use/NG:маанартай PD ;
+Ins:манаар PD ;
+Ins+Use/NG:маанараар PD ;

LEXICON MAANAD_LEX
+Nom:маанад PD ;
+Acc:маанадые PD ;
+Acc+Use/NG:маанады PD ;
+Gen:маанадай PD ;
+Dat:маанадта PD ;
+Abl:маанадһаа PD ;
+Com:маанадтай PD ;
+Ins:маанадаар PD ;

LEXICON MAANADUUD_LEX
+Nom:маанадууд PD ;
+Acc:маанадуудые PD ;
+Acc+Use/NG:маанадууды PD ;
+Gen:маанадуудай PD ;
+Dat:маанадуудта PD ;
+Abl:маанадуудһаа PD ;
+Com:маанадуудтай PD ;
+Ins:маанадуудаар PD ;

LEXICON SHI_LEX
+Nom:ши PD ;
+Acc:шамайе PD ;
+Acc+Use/NG:шамай PD ;
+Gen:шинии PD ;
+Dat:шамда PD ;
+Abl:шамһаа PD ;
+Com:шамтай PD ;
+Ins:шамаар PD ;

LEXICON TA_LEX
+Nom:та PD ;
+Acc:таниие PD ;
+Acc+Use/NG:тании PD ;
+Gen:танай PD ;
+Dat:танда PD ;
+Abl:танһаа PD ;
+Com:тантай PD ;
+Ins:танаар PD ;

LEXICON TAANAR_LEX
+Nom:таанар PD ;
+Acc:таанарые PD ;
+Acc+Use/NG:таанары PD ;
+Gen:таанарай PD ;
+Dat:таанарта PD ;
+Abl:таанарһаа PD ;
+Com:таанартай PD ;
+Ins:таанараар PD ;

LEXICON TAANAD_LEX
+Nom:таанад PD ;
+Acc:таанадые PD ;
+Acc+Use/NG:таанады PD ;
+Gen:таанадай PD ;
+Dat:таанадта PD ;
+Abl:таанадһаа PD ;
+Com:таанадтай PD ;
+Ins:таанадаар PD ;

LEXICON TAANADUUD_LEX
+Nom:таанадууд PD ;
+Acc:таанадуудые PD ;
+Acc+Use/NG:таанадууды PD ;
+Gen:таанадуудай PD ;
+Dat:таанадуудта PD ;
+Abl:таанадуудһаа PD ;
+Com:таанадуудтай PD ;
+Ins:таанадуудаар PD ;

LEXICON TERE_LEX
+Nom:тэрэ PD ;
+Acc:тэрэниие PD ;
+Acc+Use/NG:тэрэнии PD ;
+Acc+Use/NG:тэрээниие PD ;
+Acc+Use/NG:тэрээнии PD ;
+Gen:тэрэнэй PD ;
+Gen+Use/NG:тэрээнэй PD ;
+Dat:тэрэндэ PD ;
+Dat+Use/NG:тэрээндэ PD ;
+Abl:тэрэнһээ PD ;
+Abl+Use/NG:тэрээнһээ PD ;
+Com:тэрэнтэй PD ;
+Com+Use/NG:тэрээнтэй PD ;
+Ins:тэрэнээр PD ;
+Ins+Use/NG:тэрээнээр PD ;

LEXICON TEDE_LEX
+Nom:тэдэ PD ;
+Acc:тэдэниие PD ;
+Acc+Use/NG:тэдэнии PD ;
+Acc+Use/NG:тэдээниие PD ;
+Acc+Use/NG:тэдээнии PD ;
+Gen:тэдэнэй PD ;
+Gen+Use/NG:тэдээнэй PD ;
+Dat:тэдэндэ PD ;
+Dat+Use/NG:тэдээндэ PD ;
+Abl:тэдэнһээ PD ;
+Abl+Use/NG:тэдээнһээ PD ;
+Com:тэдэнтэй PD ;
+Com+Use/NG:тэдээнтэй PD ;
+Ins:тэдэнээр PD ;
+Ins+Use/NG:тэдээнээр PD ;

LEXICON TEDENER_LEX
+Nom:тэдэнэр PD ;
+Acc:тэдэнэрые PD ;
+Acc+Use/NG:тэдэнэры PD ;
+Gen:тэдэнэрэй PD ;
+Dat:тэдэнэртэ PD ;
+Abl:тэдэнэрһээ PD ;
+Com:тэдэнэртэй PD ;
+Ins:тэдэнэрээр PD ;

LEXICON TEDEENUUD_LEX
+Nom:тэдээнүүд PD ;
+Acc:тэдээнүүдые PD ;
+Acc+Use/NG:тэдээнүүды PD ;
+Gen:тэдээнүүдэй PD ;
+Dat:тэдээнүүдтэ PD ;
+Abl:тэдээнүүдһээ PD ;
+Com:тэдээнүүдтэй PD ;
+Ins:тэдээнүүдээр PD ;

LEXICON PD
# ;
+Dem:%>би # ;
+Dem:%>б%{Y%} # ;

LEXICON Demonstrative

алишье DET "wһat" ;

булта DET "all" ;
бусад DET "otһer" ;
бухы DET "all" ;
бүхы DET "all" ;
бүхэ DET "all" ;
бүхэниие DET "every" ;
даяар DET "tһat" ;
зарим DET "some" ;
нүгөө DET "otһer" ;
тиихэ DET "tһat" ;
хамаг DET "all" ;
эдэ DET "tһese" ;
энэ DET "tһis" ;
энэл DET "tһis" ;
энээхэн DET "tһis" ;
ямар DET "ямар" ;
ямаршье DET "any" ;
өөр DET "self" ;
өөһэд DET "self" ;

LEXICON DET
+Det: # ;


!LEXICON Reflexive
!K ;

LEXICON Unclassified
θөрөө xpron ;
θөһэдөө xpron ;
алииеньшье xpron "any" ;
бидэнтэеэ xpron ;
бишье xpron ;
бултадаа xpron ;
бултанайнгаа xpron ;
бултанииемнай xpron ;
бултыемнай xpron ;
бусадһаа xpron ;
бэедээ xpron ;
бэеынгээ xpron ;
бэеэ xpron "eacһ" ;
бүгэдые xpron "everybody" ;
бүгэдэ xpron ;
бүхые xpron ;
бүхэн xpron "eacһ" ;
манаа xpron ;
мы xpron "we" ;
намааршье xpron ;
намтаяа xpron ;
нэгэдэн xpron ;
олониие xpron ;
олонхимнай xpron ;
табяа xpron "tһere" ;
тарбагатайская xpron "Tarbagatai" ;
тэдэмнай xpron ;
тэдэнэйнь xpron ;
тэдэнээ xpron ;
тэдэнээ xpron ;
тэрэмни xpron ;
тэрэнээ xpron ;
тэрэшни xpron ;
тэрэшни xpron ;
тэрээн xpron ;
тэрээн xpron ;
тэрээндэнь xpron ;
тэрээхэнэй xpron ;
хамагые xpron ;
хэдышье xpron ;
хэншье xpron "anyone" ;
хэншье xpron "anyone" ;
хэнэй xpron "wһom" ;
хэнэй xpron "wһose" ;
хэнэйшье xpron ;
шиниихиһээ xpron ;
энэнь xpron ;
энэнь xpron ;
энэшни xpron ;
энэшни xpron ;
энээн xpron ;
энээндэнь xpron ;
энээниие xpron ;
энээниие xpron ;
энээхэндэ xpron ;
энээхэниие xpron ;
энэһээ xpron ;
юу xpron "wһat" ;
юуб xpron ;
юуб xpron ;
юугээ xpron ;
юугээрээ xpron ;
юумыешни xpron ;
юумэ xpron ;
юумэ xpron ;
юумэеэ xpron ;
юумэнүүдые xpron ;
юун xpron "wһat" ;
юуншье xpron "notһing" ;
юуншье xpron "wһat" ;
юунһээшье xpron ;
юунһээшье xpron ;
үнөөхи xpron "tһis_one" ;
өөдөө xpron "one's_own" ;
өөрөө xpron "oneself" ;
өөрөө xpron "self" ;
өөрөөшье xpron ;
өөрөөшье xpron ;
өөһэнөө xpron ;

LEXICON xpron
+Pron: # ; ! TODO: classify these
